California, session 20252026, AB1740.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 30512.5 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:30512.5. (a) On or before January 1, 2029, the City of Santa Monica shall submit to the commission a complete, proposed local coastal program for the city’s portion of the coastal zone. The city’s proposed local coastal program shall be processed in accordance with this article and the commission shall act within six months of receipt of a submitted complete proposal, unless an extension is requested by the city.(b)If the city submits to the commission a complete, proposed local coastal program, as required by subdivision (a), on or before December 31, 2027, the city shall be prioritized for funding made available to local governments by the Active Transportation Program pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 2380) of Division 3 of the Streets and Highways Code for projects consistent with the city’s certified local coastal program to the extent not in conflict with federal law. (c)(b) (1) If the city submits to the commission a complete, proposed local coastal program, as required by subdivision (a), the commission shall, within 45 days of receipt, provide the city, in writing, a list of identified issues, if any, that require further refinement through suggested modifications for the local coastal program to be found consistent with this division.(2) Following the city’s receipt of the list of issues, if any, the commission and the city shall coordinate expeditiously and in good faith to reach agreement on any suggested modifications within six months of receipt of the submitted complete proposal. If the commission fails to act on the city’s submitted complete local coastal program within six months of receipt, the commission shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature for these purposes, reimburse the city for reasonable costs associated with the time spent coordinating on the suggested modifications.(d)(c) If the commission fails to act on the city’s complete, proposed local coastal program within six months of receipt, unless an extension is requested by the city pursuant to subdivision (a), the commission shall provide quarterly, written updates to the Legislature, consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code, describing the reasons for the delay, a summary of the remaining steps necessary to place the local coastal program on the commission’s meeting agenda, and an estimated timeline for approval and certification of the city’s local coastal program.(e)(d) Subsequent to the effective certification of the city’s local coastal program, and acceptance of the program by the city, the city shall immediately assume coastal development permitting authority, consistent with this division.(f)(e) For purposes of this section, “city” means the City of Santa Monica.SEC. 2. Section 30610.91 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:30610.91. (a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares that designing and building complete streets that safely accommodate the needs of nonmotorized vehicles, pedestrians, and motorized vehicles in the coastal zone is preferred and encouraged.(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that this section expedites the provision of safe, multimodal travel within urbanized areas of the coastal zone for the purpose of increasing public access to the coast for residents and visitors, limiting vehicle miles traveled, and reducing greenhouse gas emissions.(b) An application for a coastal development permit or local coastal program amendment to convert an existing motorized vehicle travel lane into a dedicated bicycle lane, dedicated transit lane, or a pedestrian walkway, shall not be required to include a traffic study.(c) (1) If a proposal to convert part or all of the developed portion of an existing road right-of-way into a bicycle right-of-way, transit right-of-way, pedestrian walkway, or a combination thereof requires an amendment to a local coastal program, the amendment shall be processed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 30514, if the executive director determines that, on balance, the project will provide commensurate or enhanced public access to the coast.(2) In making the determination pursuant to paragraph (1), the executive director shall consider the public access benefits of enhanced transit infrastructure, and bicycle and pedestrian access. Projects that include the removal of public parking shall not be precluded from being eligible for processing pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 30514.(d) (1) For an application for a coastal development permit to convert part or all of the developed portion of an existing road right-of-way that is not a state highway into a bicycle right-of-way, transit right-of-way, pedestrian walkway, or a combination thereof, the executive director shall waive the coastal development permit requirement pursuant to Section 30624.7 if the executive director determines that, on balance, the project will provide commensurate or enhanced public access to the coast.(2) In making the determination pursuant to paragraph (1), the executive director shall consider the public access benefits of enhanced transit infrastructure, and bicycle and pedestrian access. Projects that include the removal of public parking shall not be precluded from being eligible for a waiver pursuant to Section 30624.7.(e) (1) The executive director shall maintain and make available for public review, in a single location, records of all applications submitted pursuant to subdivision (d).(2) On or before January 31 of each year, the commission shall post on its internet website and transmit to the Legislature, consistent with Section 9795 of the Government Code, a report covering the preceding calendar year that includes, at a minimum, all of the following:(A) The total number of applications received pursuant to subdivision (d) and the relevant application numbers.(B) The number of applications for which the coastal development permit requirement was waived pursuant to Section 30624.7, including a brief description of each project and the basis for the executive director’s determination that the project would provide commensurate or enhanced public access to the coast.(C) The number of applications denied a waiver, including the stated reason for each denial.(D) The number of applications pending review as of December 31 of the reporting year.(E) Any geographic or jurisdictional patterns identified by the executive director in the distribution of applications, waivers, or denials.(3) All records required by this subdivision shall be made available to the public in a searchable, machine-readable format and shall be retained for no fewer than 10 years. years from the date an application is submitted pursuant to subdivision (d).(4) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to delay or otherwise affect the timeline for processing an individual application under subdivision (d).(5) This Except as provided in paragraph (3), this subdivision shall remain in effect only until December 31, 2032.SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the need to accelerate housing to meet the City of Santa Monica’s housing needs and to reduce greenhouse gas emissions from transportation in the city.SEC. 4. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.